Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1097.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Supplemental appropriations for relief of named claimants; basis of claims; coordination A. The payment of the sums appropriated by this section is in full satisfaction of the claims described in this section. The department of administration shall coordinate payments. B. The sum of $1,025.25 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of administration to pay the following claimant the following amount: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Central Services Bureau                   ADARB2601      FY22  $ 1,025.25 $ 1,025.25 C. The sum of $1,997.24 is appropriated from the special employee health insurance trust fund established by section 38-654, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of administration to pay the following claimant the following amounts: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Konica Minolta                            ADARB2602      FY22  $  917.51 Konica Minolta                            ADARB2603      FY23   1,079.73 $ 1,997.24 D. The sum of $17,944.04 is appropriated from the risk management revolving fund established by section 41-622, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of administration to pay the following claimants the following amounts: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Hinshaw                                   ADARB2604      FY22  $ 3,415.17 VideoDep                                  ADARB2605      FY23 308.75 4M Consulting Group                       ADARB2606      FY24 1,635.00 Esquire                                   ADARB2607      FY24 812.50 Resnick                                   ADARB2608      FY24 690.35 Sedgwick                                  ADARB2609      FY24 560.50 Alliance Evaluation Services              ADARB2610      FY24 928.97 Genex                                     ADARB2611      FY24   9,592.80 $17,944.04 E. The sum of $1,571.03 is appropriated from the automation operations fund established by section 41-711, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of administration to pay the following claimant the following amount: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Shi                                       ADARB2612      FY23  $ 1,571.03 $ 1,571.03 F. The sum of $3,145.02 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the state department of corrections to pay the following claimants the following amounts: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Hill Brothers                             DCARB2601      FY22   $ 1,189.18 Xerox                                     DCARB2602 FY24    1,955.84 $ 3,145.02 G. The sum of $7,576.88 is appropriated from the state highway fund established by section 28-6991, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of transportation to pay the following claimants the following amounts: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Johnson Controls                          DTARB2601 FY23 $ 1,581.60 ADOA Payroll ERE                          DTARB2602 FY23 2,979.42 Aslid                                     DTARB2603 FY24 520.00 DHE Computer Systems, LLC                 DTARB2604      FY24 491.86 Grasshopper                               DTARB2605      FY24    2,004.00 $ 7,576.88 H. The sum of $399.03 is appropriated from the department fleet operations fund established by section 28-7006, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of transportation to pay the following claimant the following amount: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Konica Minolta                            DTARB2606      FY22  $ 399.03 $ 399.03 I. The sum of $3,532.96 is appropriated from the administrative fund established by section 23-1081, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the industrial commission of Arizona to pay the following claimant the following amount: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount Lundmark, Barberich, LA Mont & Puig, PC   ICARB2601      FY24  $ 3,532.96 $ 3,532.96 J. The sum of $366,040.81 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2025-2026 to the department of public safety to pay the following claimant the following amount: Name                                      Claim No.      Dated    Amount VirTra, Inc                               PSARB2601      FY22  $366,040.81 $366,040.81 APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 7, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 7, 2026.